src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Verb inflection for Mansi

put derivations here

put derivations here

put derivations here
:йи INF ;

put derivations here
:лы INF ;

put derivations here
:ми INF ;

put derivations here
:ви INF ;

put derivations here

:у INF ;

## Stems ending in C
LEXICON V_NSHU йинуӈкве

LEXICON V_NSSU о̄ньщуӈкве

LEXICON V_NSSUBA 

LEXICON V_UBA 

LEXICON V_U 
put derivations here
LEXICON V0_U 
**LEXICON V0_U** 

put derivations here

**LEXICON V0_U2C** 

LEXICON V_Y/UBA 

put derivations here
**LEXICON V0_Y/U** 

put derivations here
**LEXICON V0_A** 

* **LEXICON V11_MUTUAL** 
	* **LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_VA**  

	* **LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_VU**  

	* **LEXICON ACT_COND_VU** 

	* **LEXICON ACT_IMPRT**  

	* **LEXICON ACT_IMPRT_VU**  

	* **LEXICON V11_MUTUAL_PASS_PRS**  

	* **LEXICON PASS_PRS_VU**  

the forms below here need studying. They are probably not what I labled them as20230521

the forms below here need studying. They are probably not what I labled them as20230521

Active Indicative Presence

Active Indicative Preterite

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mns/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
